Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Reimbursement of Expenses

Cross references.

Motor vehicles and aircraft for use by state officials, T. 50, C. 19.

45-7-20.
Reimbursement of travel costs for certain officials.

Except as provided in Code Section 45-7-21, each state official designated in Code Section 45-7-4 shall be reimbursed from state funds for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier, the legal mileage rate for use of a personal automobile, and the actual cost of lodging and meals while away from his office on official state business. This Code section shall not apply to the adjutant general, superior court judges, district attorneys, members of the General Assembly, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of Representatives, all of whose expenses and allowances shall be paid as provided for in Code Section 45-7-4. This Code section shall not apply to the Lieutenant Governor during sessions of the General Assembly. During such sessions, the Lieutenant Governor shall receive the same expense allowance per day as that received by a member of the General Assembly, plus reimbursement for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier and the legal mileage rate for use of a personal automobile. No official provided for in Code Sections 45-7-3, 45-7-4, this Code section, and 45-7-21 shall be reimbursed from state funds for any transportation, mileage, lodging, or meals for which he is reimbursed from funds other than state funds.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 701, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 4, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45.

Cross references.

Contingent expense and travel allowances for reporters of superior courts, §

15-14-6

.

Legal mileage rate, §

50-19-7

.

Editor’s notes.

Resolution Act No. 48 (Senate Resolution No. 101), approved April 19, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 1365), relating to the development, issuance, review, and revision of employee travel reimbursement policies by the Department of Audits and the Office of Planning and Budget, was repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 41.

45-7-21.
Expense allowance and travel cost reimbursement for members of certain boards and commissions.

Each member of the boards and commissions enumerated in this Code section shall receive the same expense allowance per day as that received by a member of the General Assembly for each day such member of a board or commission is in attendance at a meeting of such board or commission, plus reimbursement for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier or the legal mileage rate for the use of a personal automobile in connection with such attendance. The expense allowance and reimbursement provided for in this Code section shall be paid in lieu of any per diem, allowance, or other remuneration now received by any such member for such attendance. The existing law relative to any limitation on the number of meeting days and remuneration for service on committees or subcommittees of any such board or commission shall remain in effect. The boards and commissions to which this Code section shall be applicable are as follows:

State Board of Education;

Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia;

(2.1)

Board of Community Supervision;

(2.2)

Board of Public Safety;

Board of Corrections;

Board of Economic Development;

Board of Natural Resources;

Georgia Emergency Communications Authority;

Dental Education Board;

Georgia Student Finance Commission;

Veterans Service Board;

Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority;

Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce;

Georgia Music Hall of Fame Authority;

Georgia Sports Hall of Fame Authority;

Georgia Rail Passenger Authority;

State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia; and

Civil War Commission.

(a.1)

Each member of any state board whose membership is elected wholly by votes of the members of the House of Representatives and Senate shall receive the same per diem and transportation costs as that received by a member of the General Assembly for each day of actual attendance at meetings of such board and the committee meetings of such boards.

Whenever this Code section or any other law of this state provides that members of any board, commission, or other body shall receive the same daily expense allowance as members of the General Assembly, whether by specific reference to this Code section or any other law or by a more general reference, the members of such board, commission, or other body shall receive a daily expense allowance of $105.00. Such $105.00 amount shall apply for members of such boards, commissions, and other bodies, regardless of whether the amount actually received by members of the General Assembly under Code Section 28-1-8 is more or less than $105.00. The provisions of this subsection shall control over any conflicting provisions of any other earlier enacted law.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 701, § 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 4, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 427, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641, § 11; Ga. L. 1990, p. 6, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1320, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 809, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1251, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1041, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 721, § 1.1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1242, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 1249, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1344, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 924, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690, § 16; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 45/SB 103; Ga. L. 2011, p. 459, § 4/HB 509; Ga. L. 2011, p. 632, § 3/HB 49; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-94/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 282, § 1/SB 417; Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 3-2/HB 751; Ga. L. 2019, p. 224, § 2/SB 207; Ga. L. 2019, p. 311, § 1/HB 392; Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 2-3/HB 553.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added paragraph (a)(2.1).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “Reserved” for “State Transportation Board” in paragraph (a)(6) and added subsection (a.1).

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(6) for the former provisions, which read: “Reserved.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendments.

The first 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce” for “Georgia Board for Physician Workforce” in paragraph (a)(11). The second 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, added paragraph (a)(2.2). The third 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, deleted former paragraph (a)(15), which read: “Georgia Tobacco Community Development Board;”; redesignated former paragraphs (a)(16) and (a)(17) as present paragraphs (a)(15) and (a)(16), respectively; added “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(15); deleted “; and” at the end of paragraph (a)(16); and deleted former paragraph (a)(18), which read: “The delegation from the State of Georgia to the Southern Dairy Compact Commission”.

Cross references.

Expense allowance authorized for delegation to the Southern Dairy Compact Commission, §

2-20-1

.

Daily expense allowance authorized for members of General Assembly, § 45-7-4(a)(22).

Legal mileage allowance, §

50-19-7

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, in subsection (a), paragraph (16) as enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1249, § 2, was redesignated as paragraph (17), “and” was deleted from the end of paragraph (15), and “; and” was substituted for a period at the end of paragraph (16).

Editor’s notes.

Resolution Act No. 48 (Senate Resolution
No. 101), approved April 19, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 1365), relating to the development, issuance, review, and revision of employee travel reimbursement policies by the Department of Audits and the Office of Planning and Budget, was repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 41.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641,
§ 18, not codified by the General Assembly provides that: “In the event of any substantive conflict between this Act and any other Act of the 1989 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(b) The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019.
Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For note on 1999 amendment to this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1999).

45-7-22.
Reimbursement for relocation expenses — Authorization generally.

Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a state department may reimburse an employee of state government for expenses incurred for transportation of household goods and expenses incident to a change of residence from one part of the state to another as a result of an action of the state department requiring such relocation when such action is in the best interest of the department; provided, however, that the Department of Economic Development may also reimburse an employee of that department for transportation of household goods and expenses incident to a change of residence to a foreign country as a result of an action of that department requiring such relocation when such action is in the best interest of that department.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 708, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 429, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641, § 12; Ga. L. 2004, p. 690, § 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641, § 18, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of any substantive conflict between this Act and any other Act of the 1989 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act.”

45-7-23.
Reimbursement for relocation expenses — Conditions.

Before the reimbursement of expenses to transferred employees may take place, the following conditions must be satisfied:

The department which employs the person transferred must certify that the move was in the best interest of the department and that the expenses incurred are reasonable and proper; and

The employee must sign an agreement that he will remain employed by the department in the location to which the move was made for a period of not less than one year following the effective date of the move, unless separated or transferred for reasons beyond his control and acceptable to the department concerned. In case of violation of such agreement, any funds expended by the state for expense reimbursement will be recoverable from the employee concerned as a debt due the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 708, § 2.

45-7-24.
Reimbursement for relocation expenses — Rules, regulations, and policies.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall establish such rules, regulations, and policies as are necessary to administer such a program of reimbursement for all state employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 708, § 3.

45-7-25.
Advance travel funds — Employee trust accounts authorized.

Each department, agency, institution, and board of the state is authorized to establish employee trust accounts as are necessary to account for state funds which are advanced to employees for travel purposes in the conduct of official state business and as are necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this Code section and Code Sections 45-7-26 through 45-7-28.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 842, § 1.

45-7-26.
Advance travel funds — Rules and regulations for accounting of funds.

The director of the Office of Planning and Budget shall develop the necessary rules, regulations, and procedures to govern the advance of state funds to employees prior to travel in the conduct of official state business and to provide for proper accounting of the state funds advanced to such employees on a timely basis following such employees’ return from travel status.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 842, § 2.

45-7-27.
Advance travel funds — Accounting and reimbursement of unused funds.

Each employee granted an advance of state funds under this Code section and Code Sections 45-7-25, 45-7-26, and 45-7-28 shall be the custodian of state funds entrusted to him, shall file an accounting of such funds, and shall reimburse unused travel advances as required by the rules and regulations adopted by the director of the Office of Planning and Budget.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 842, § 3.

45-7-28.
Advance travel funds — Lien when employee fails to file accounting or reimburse funds.

Should any employee granted a travel advance under this Code section and Code Sections 45-7-25 through 45-7-27 fail to file an accounting and reimbursement as provided by the rules and regulations adopted by the director of the Office of Planning and Budget, the head of each agency shall file with the director of the Office of Planning and Budget a certification of the amount so advanced, which shall then become a lien against any and all funds or moneys due the employee from the state or from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 842, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-7-28.1.
[Repealed] Employee travel reimbursement; rules and regulations to be issued by the Department of Audits and Accounts and the Office of Planning and Budget.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 1365; Code 1981, §

45-7-28.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 35/HB 293, effective July 1, 2005.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79, repealed the reservation of this Code section, effective April 24, 2013.

45-7-29.
Reimbursement for expenses of lodging and air fare — Supporting documentation required.

No official or employee of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government shall be reimbursed from public funds for expenses for lodging and air fare incurred in the performance of his duties unless a bill, receipt, or similar supporting document showing payment therefor or an explanation of the absence of such documentation shall be submitted when applying for reimbursement.

The requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be in addition to any other requirements relative to reimbursement for any expenses incurred by any such official or employee in the performance of his duties which are now or hereafter provided for by law. The requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section also shall not preclude the promulgation by any agency of the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government of any rule or regulation or policy relative to reimbursement for any expenses.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1919, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Resolution Act No. 48 (Senate Resolution
No. 101), approved April 19, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 1365), relating to the development, issuance, review, and revision of employee travel reimbursement policies by the Department of Audits and the Office of Planning and Budget, was repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 41.

45-7-30.
Reimbursement for expenses of first-class air fare.

Except as provided in this Code section, no state official or employee, when traveling by commercial air carrier on a first-class basis, shall be reimbursed for that portion of the first-class air fare which exceeds the amount of the fare of the next lowest fare for the flight on which such official or employee is traveling. This shall not prohibit the reimbursement for the entire cost of first-class air fare under any of the following conditions:

Space is not otherwise available;

A licensed medical practitioner certifies that because of a person’s mental or physical condition specific air travel arrangements are required; or

The commissioner of public safety certifies that specific air travel arrangements are necessary for security reasons.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1919, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Resolution Act No. 48 (Senate Resolution
No. 101), approved April 19, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 1365), relating to the development, issuance, review, and revision of employee travel reimbursement policies by the Department of Audits and the Office of Planning and Budget, was repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 41.

45-7-31.
Reimbursement for expenses — Per diem allowances.

This Code section and Code Sections 45-7-29, 45-7-30, and 45-7-32 shall not apply to per diem allowances authorized by law for officials or employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1919, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Resolution Act No. 48 (Senate Resolution
No. 101), approved April 19, 1979 (Ga. L. 1979, p. 1365), relating to the development, issuance, review, and revision of employee travel reimbursement policies by the Department of Audits and the Office of Planning and Budget, was repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 41.

45-7-32.
Unlawful use of travel advance received from public funds for nongovernmental purposes; fraudulent request for reimbursement of expenses; penalty for violations.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use any travel advance received from public funds for nongovernmental purposes or to submit or approve, knowingly or through willful and wanton neglect, a fraudulent request to the state for reimbursement of expenses.

Any person who, in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section, uses any travel advance for nongovernmental purposes or submits or approves, knowingly or through willful and wanton neglect, a fraudulent request for reimbursement of expenses valued in the aggregate at less than $500.00 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature which shall be punishable by not more than 12 months’ imprisonment and a fine not to exceed $5,000.00. In addition to the foregoing criminal penalties, any such person shall also be subject to immediate termination of state employment and shall owe restitution to the state equal to the amount of such misappropriated travel advances or fraudulent reimbursements, plus interest to be assessed at a rate of 12 percent per annum to be calculated from the date each misappropriated travel advance or fraudulent reimbursement payment was made.

Any person who, in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section, uses any travel advance for nongovernmental purposes or submits or approves knowingly, or through willful and wanton neglect, a fraudulent request for reimbursement of expenses valued in the aggregate at $500.00 or more shall be guilty of a felony which shall be punishable by not less than one nor more than 20 years’ imprisonment and a fine not to exceed $50,000.00 or triple the amount of such misappropriated travel advances or fraudulent reimbursement payments, whichever is greater. In addition to such criminal penalties, any such person shall also be subject to immediate termination of state employment and shall owe restitution to the state equal to the amount of such misappropriated travel advances or fraudulent reimbursements, plus interest to be assessed at a rate of 12 percent per annum to be calculated from the date each misappropriated travel advance or fraudulent reimbursement payment was made.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1919, § 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 776, § 3/HB 1113.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, in subsection (a), a comma was deleted following “funds” and in subsection (b), a comma was deleted following “expenses” in the first sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 776, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “For the purpose of promulgating rules and regulations, policies, procedures, and manuals, this Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
For all other purposes, this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2008, and shall apply to all transactions occurring on and after such date.” The Governor approved this Act on May 14, 2008.

45-7-33.
Reimbursement for expenses in filing application for commercial driver’s license.

Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a state department may reimburse an employee of state government for expenses incurred in filing an application for obtaining a commercial driver’s license as such application fee is set forth in Article 7 of Chapter 5 of Title 40.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-7-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45.

45-7-34.
Rules and regulations for administering reimbursement programs.

The Office of Planning and Budget shall establish such rules, regulations, and policies as are necessary to administer such a program of reimbursement for all state employees.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-7-34

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 131, § 1.